Hawaii statutes.
§634-25 Personal service on resident
outside the State. [(a)] Whenever a defendant, being a resident of the
State, cannot be served within the State[,] personal service may be made upon
the defendant outside the State by any person authorized to serve process in
the place in which the defendant may be found or specially appointed by the
court to make the service[,] which service shall be evidenced by the return of
the serving officer or by affidavit and shall be of the same legal force and
validity as if made within the State.

[(b)] The affidavit required by this section
shall set forth facts based upon the personal knowledge of the affiant
concerning the methods, means, and attempts made to satisfy the requirements of
this section and any other pertinent facts. [L 1972, c 89, §2A(h); HRS
§634-60.5; ren HRS §634-25; am L 1976, c 183, §3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next